Hawaii statutes.
[§482D-4] Standard of fineness of silver
articles; deviation. (a) The actual variation of fineness of silver or
alloy of articles made in whole or in part of silver or its alloys shall not be
less by more than .004 parts than the actual fineness indicated by any mark
(other than the word "sterling" or the word "coin") stamped
upon any part of the article.

(b) No article shall be stamped with the word
"ster", "sterling", or "sterling silver" or any
colorable imitation thereof, unless the article contains .925 parts pure
silver.

(c) No article shall be stamped with the words
"coin" or "coin silver" or any colorable imitation thereof,
unless the article contains .900 parts pure silver; provided, however:

(1) That in the case of all articles whose fineness
is indicated by the word "sterling" or the word "coin"
there shall be allowed a divergence in the fineness of .004 parts from these
standards;

(2) That in any test for the ascertainment of the
fineness of any article mentioned in this section that part of the article
taken for the test shall be such part as does not contain any solder or alloy
of inferior fineness used for brazing or uniting the parts of such article; and

(3) That in the case of any article mentioned in this
section in addition to the foregoing tests and standards, the actual fineness
of the entire quantity of silver or of its alloys contained in the articles,
including all solder and alloy of inferior fineness used for brazing or uniting
the parts of such article (all such silver, alloys, and solder being assayed as
one piece), shall not be less by more than .010 parts than the fineness
indicated by the mark stamped upon the article. [L 1990, c 343, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next